Illinois, session 104th, SB4107.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 7Department of Healthcare and Family Services for the purposes 8hereinafter named:9PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION10Payable from General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services............................20,320,50012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security..................................1,554,50014  For Contractual Services..........................1,760,10015  For Travel..........................................101,20016  For Commodities...........................................017  For Printing..............................................018  For Equipment.............................................019  For Electronic Data Processing...................13,165,00020  For Telecommunications Services...........................021  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................34,00022  For Deposit into the Public Aid23   Recoveries Trust Fund...........................48,995,000  SB4107- 2 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1    Total                                         $85,930,3002Payable from the HFS Technology Initiative Fund:3  For Costs Associated with the Illinois4   Health and Human Services Innovation5   Incubator Program, including Operational6   and Administrative Costs........................15,000,0007Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:8  For Personal Services.............................5,169,2009  For State Contributions to State10   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,246,30011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security....................................395,40013  For Group Insurance...............................1,566,40014  For Contractual Services..........................5,367,20015  For Commodities.....................................232,60016  For Printing........................................360,70017  For Equipment.....................................1,248,80018  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,620,80019  For Telecommunications Services...................1,185,00020  For Costs Associated with Information 21   Technology Infrastructure.......................54,754,00022  For State Prompt Payment Act Interest Costs..........25,00023    Total                                         $75,171,40024OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL25Payable from General Revenue Fund:26  For Personal Services.............................6,690,800  SB4107- 3 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1  For State Contributions to2   Social Security....................................511,8003  For Contractual Services..................................04  For Travel...........................................40,0005  For Equipment............................................ 06    Total                                          $7,242,6007Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:8  For Administrative Expenses.........................282,0009Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:10  For Personal Services............................11,723,60011  For State Contributions to State12   Employees' Retirement System.....................5,094,50013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security....................................896,90015  For Group Insurance...............................3,872,00016  For Contractual Services..........................8,618,50017  For Travel..........................................108,80018  For Commodities...........................................019  For Printing..............................................020  For Equipment.............................................021  For Telecommunications Services...........................022    Total                                         $30,314,30023CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES24Payable from General Revenue Fund:25  For Deposit into the Child Support26   Administrative Fund.............................61,800,000  SB4107- 4 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1Payable from Child Support Administrative Fund:2  For Personal Services............................66,708,2003  For State Contributions to State4   Employees' Retirement System....................28,988,0005  For State Contributions to 6   Social Security..................................5,103,2007  For Group Insurance..............................27,244,8008  For Contractual Services.........................86,850,7009  For Travel..........................................140,70010  For Commodities.....................................292,00011  For Printing........................................360,00012  For Equipment.....................................1,553,10013  For Electronic Data Processing...................16,197,60014  For Telecommunications Services...................1,900,00015  For Child Support Enforcement16   Demonstration Projects.............................500,00017  For Administrative Costs Related to18   Enhanced Collection Efforts including19   Paternity Adjudication Demonstration.............7,500,00020  For Costs Related to the State21   Disbursement Unit...............................11,500,00022  For State Prompt Payment Act Interest Costs..........50,00023    Total                                        $254,888,30024PUBLIC AID RECOVERIES25Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:26  For Personal Services............................10,657,700  SB4107- 5 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.....................4,631,3003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security....................................815,3005  For Group Insurance...............................4,333,5006  For Contractual Services.........................12,898,6007  For Travel..........................................107,2008  For Commodities...........................................09  For Printing..............................................010  For Equipment.............................................011  For Telecommunications Services...........................012    Total                                         $33,443,60013MEDICAL14Payable from General Revenue Fund:15  For Deposit into the Medicaid Technical16   Assistance Center Fund.............................500,00017  For Costs Associated with the Critical18   Access Care Pharmacy Program....................10,000,00019    Total                                         $10,500,00020Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:21  For Personal Services............................18,389,60022  For State Contributions to State23   Employees' Retirement System.....................7,991,20024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security..................................1,406,80026  For Group Insurance...............................7,172,800  SB4107- 6 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1  For Contractual Services.........................82,597,5002  For Commodities...........................................03  For Printing..............................................04  For Equipment.............................................05  For Telecommunications Services...........................06  For Costs Associated with the7   Development, Implementation and8   Operation of a Data Warehouse...................21,368,2009    Total                                        $138,926,10010Payable from Healthcare Provider Relief Fund:11  For Operational Expenses.........................73,155,60012  For Payments in Support of the13   Operation of the Illinois14   Poison Center....................................4,750,000 15    Section 10. The amount of $2,383,299,400, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department 17of Healthcare and Family Services from the General Revenue 18Fund for deposit into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. 19    Section 15. In addition to any amounts heretofore 20appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 22Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 23Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:24Payable from General Revenue Fund:  SB4107- 7 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1  For Medical Assistance Providers and2   Related Operating and Administrative3   Costs.......................................$6,077,606,900 4   The amount of $0, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 5appropriated to the Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services from the General Revenue Fund for Medical Assistance 7pursuant to subsections (a-6) and (a-7) of Section 12-4.35 of 8the Illinois Public Aid Code. 9   The amount of $110,000,000, or so much thereof as may be 10necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Healthcare and 11Family Services from the General Revenue Fund for deposit into 12the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund for Medical Assistance 13pursuant to subsection (a-5) of Section 12-4.35 of the 14Illinois Public Aid Code. 15   In addition to any amounts heretofore appropriated, the 16following named amounts, or so much thereof as may be 17necessary, are appropriated to the Department of Healthcare 18and Family Services for Medical Assistance for reimbursement 19or coverage of prescribed drugs, other pharmacy products, and 20payments to managed care organizations including related 21administrative and operation costs:22Payable from Drug Rebate Fund...................2,000,000,000   SB4107- 8 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1   In addition to any amounts heretofore appropriated, the 2following named amounts, or so much thereof as may be 3necessary, are appropriated to the Department of Healthcare 4and Family Services for costs related to the operation of the 5Health Benefits for Workers with Disabilities Program:6Payable from Medicaid Buy-In Program 7 Revolving Fund.......................................892,600 8    Section 20. In addition to any amount heretofore 9appropriated, the amount of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 11Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Interagency 12Program Fund for i) Medical Assistance payments on behalf of 13individuals eligible for Medical Assistance programs 14administered by the Department of Healthcare and Family 15Services, and ii) pursuant to an interagency agreement, 16medical services and other costs associated with programs 17administered by another agency of state government, including 18operating and administrative costs. 19    Section 25. In addition to any amounts heretofore 20appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 22Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 23Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:24Payable from Care Provider Fund for Persons   SB4107- 9 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1 with a Developmental Disability:2  For Administrative Expenditures.....................300,0003Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:4  For Skilled, Intermediate, and Other Related 5   Long-Term Care Services and Payments6   to Managed Care Organizations..................950,000,0007  For Administrative Expenditures...................6,109,6008    Total                                        $956,109,6009Payable from Hospital Provider Fund:10  For Hospitals, Capitated Managed Care11   Organizations as necessary to comply12   with Article V-A of the13   Illinois Public Aid Code, and Related 14   Operating and Administrative Costs...........7,900,000,00015Payable from Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:16  For Medical Assistance Providers................550,000,00017Payable from Healthcare Provider Relief Fund:18  For Medical Assistance Providers19   and Related Operating and20   Administrative Costs........................21,000,000,00021  For Medical Assistance Pursuant to22   subsections (a-6) and (a-7) of Section 12-4.3523   of the Illinois Public Aid Code..........................024  For Medical Assistance Pursuant to25   subsection (a-5) of Section 12-4.3526   of the Illinois Public Aid Code................143,600,000  SB4107- 10 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1    Total                                     $21,143,600,000 2    Section 30. In addition to any amounts heretofore 3appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 5Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 6Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:7Payable from County Provider Trust Fund:8  For Medical Services..........................4,100,000,0009  For Administrative Expenditures Including10   Pass-through of Federal Matching Funds..........25,000,00011    Total                                      $4,125,000,000 12    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 14the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for refunds 15of overpayments of assessments or inter-governmental transfers 16made by providers during the period from July 1, 1991 through 17June 30, 2026:18Payable from:19  Care Provider Fund for Persons20   with a Developmental Disability..................1,000,00021  Long-Term Care Provider Fund......................2,750,00022  Hospital Provider Fund............................5,000,00023  County Provider Trust Fund........................1,000,00024    Total                                          $9,750,000   SB4107- 11 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1    Section 40. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 3Healthcare and Family Services from the Trauma Center Fund for 4adjustment payments to certain Level I and Level II trauma 5centers. 6    Section 45. The amount of $375,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services from the University of Illinois 9Hospital Services Fund to reimburse the University of Illinois 10Hospital for medical services. 11    Section 50. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Special 14Purposes Trust Fund for medical demonstration projects and 15costs associated with the implementation of federal Health 16Insurance Portability and Accountability Act mandates. 17    Section 55. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 19Healthcare and Family Services from the Medicaid Technical 20Assistance Center Fund for all costs, including grants and 21related operating and administrative costs, associated with 22the establishment, administration, and operations of the   SB4107- 12 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1Medicaid Technical Assistance Center. 2    Section 60. The amount of $475,000,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 4Healthcare and Family Services from the Special Education 5Medicaid Matching Fund for payments to local education 6agencies for medical services and other costs eligible for 7federal reimbursement under Title XIX or Title XXI of the 8federal Social Security Act. 9    Section 65. In addition to any amounts heretofore 10appropriated, the amount of $10,200,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 12Healthcare and Family Services from the Money Follows the 13Person Budget Transfer Fund for costs associated with 14long-term care, including related operating and administrative 15costs. Such costs shall include, but not necessarily be 16limited to, those related to long-term care rebalancing 17efforts, institutional long-term care services, and pursuant 18to an interagency agreement, community-based services 19administered by another agency of state government. 20    Section 70. The amount of $8,000,000, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 22Healthcare and Family Services from the Illinois Health 23Benefits Exchange Fund for all costs, including but not   SB4107- 13 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1limited to grants, outreach, operations, and administrative 2expenses associated with the establishment and operation of 3the Illinois Health Benefits Exchange and coordinating 4operations of the Exchange with State medical assistance 5programs. 6    Section 75. In addition to any amounts heretofore 7appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 9Department of Healthcare and Family Services for State Prompt 10Payment Act interest costs:11Payable from the General Revenue Fund...............5,000,00012Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:.............10,00013Payable from the Hospital Provider Fund:..............200,00014Payable from the Trauma Center Fund:...................10,00015Payable from the Money Follows the Person 16 Budget Transfer Fund:.................................10,00017Payable from the Medical Interagency 18 Program Fund:........................................200,00019Payable from the Drug Rebate Fund:....................200,00020Payable from the Tobacco Settlement 21 Recovery Fund:........................................10,00022Payable from the Medicaid Buy-In Program 23 Revolving Fund:..........................................50024Payable from the Healthcare  25 Provider Relief Fund:..............................5,000,000  SB4107- 14 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1Payable from the Medical Special 2 Purposes Trust Fund:..................................50,000 3    Section 80. The amount of $40,000,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for 6the purpose of updating prospective payment system rates for 7Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs). 8    Section 85. The amount of $46,696,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 11made for such purpose in Article 61, Section 85 of Public Act 12104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Special 14Purposes Trust Fund for a demonstration project for preventive 15health. 16    Section 90. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 18Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Debt Relief 19Pilot Program Fund for grants and administrative costs 20associated with a pilot program for the purchase of medical 21debt incurred by patients. 22    Section 95. The amount of $85,000,000, or so much thereof   SB4107- 15 -OMB104 00201 JCB 10201 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 2Healthcare and Family Services from the Healthcare Provider 3Relief Fund for making loans under the Distressed Hospital 4Loan Program. 5    Section 100. The amount of $300,000,000, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department 7of Healthcare and Family Services from the Rural Healthcare 8Transformation Fund for all costs, including grants and 9related operating and administrative costs, associated with 10the Rural Health Transformation Program created under Public 11Law 119-21, Section 71401, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.